Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 340.310 is amended to read:
340.310. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall develop statewide  standards
for dual credit programs , including programs in agriculture, forestry and natural  resources,
to be implemented by public high schools, community colleges and public universities listed in ORS
352.002. The standards must establish the manner by which:
(a) A student in any grade from 9 through 12 may, upon completion  of a course, earn course
credit both for high school and for a community college or public university; [ and]
(b) Teachers of courses that are part  of a dual credit program will work together to determine
the quality  of the program and to ensure the alignment of the content, objectives and outcomes of
individual courses[ .]; and
(c) Career  and technical student organizations, including organizations related to agri-
culture and natural resources, will work together to determine the quality of  programs ap-
proved by the organizations to ensure the alignment of the content, objectives and outcomes
of individual courses in the programs.
(2) Each public high school, community college and public university that provides a dual credit
program must implement the statewide standards developed under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Each school district, community college and  public university that provides a dual credit
program shall submit  an annual report to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission on the
academic performance of  students enrolled in a dual credit program. The Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall establish  the required contents of the report, which must provide sufficient
information to allow the commission to determine the quality of the dual credit program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 784 (SB 784-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 784 (SB 784-A) Page 2